Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-352
Proceedings; complaint; filing; service.

A proceeding under sections 42-347 to 42-381 shall be commenced by filing a complaint in the district court. The proceeding may be heard by the county court or the district court as provided in section 25-2740. Summons shall be served upon the other party to the marriage by personal service or in the manner provided in section 25-517.02.

Laws 1972, LB 820, § 6;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 46;

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 25;

Laws 1996, LB 1296, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 12;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 20.

A district court had jurisdiction to dissolve a parties' marriage where the plaintiff satisfied procedural due process by complying with the process service requirements for dissolution proceedings under this section and also satisfied Nebraska residency requirements. Metzler v. Metzler, 25 Neb. App. 757, 913 N.W.2d 733 (2018).

Action to modify alimony obligation must satisfy the requirements of this section. Osborn v. Osborn, 4 Neb. App. 802, 550 N.W.2d 58 (1996).